src/fst/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
! Quantifier inflection

LEXICON Num1
 NumTag ;

! 2012-09-12 This distinction should be left for syntax
LEXICON NumTag
+Qnt+Attr: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: # ;

LEXICON DNUM
+Qnt+Attr: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: # ;

LEXICON NNUM
+Qnt+Attr: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
